Washington statutes.
RCW 41.59.150

Commission to prevent unfair labor practices—Scope.

(1) The commission is empowered to prevent any person from engaging in any unfair labor practice as defined in RCW 41.59.140: PROVIDED, That a complaint shall not be processed for any unfair labor practice occurring more than six months before the filing of the complaint with the commission or in superior court. This power shall not be affected by any other means of adjustment or prevention that has been or may be established by agreement, law, equity or otherwise.

(2) If the commission determines that any person has engaged in or is engaging in any such unfair labor practices as defined in RCW 41.59.140, then the commission shall issue and cause to be served upon such person an order requiring such person to cease and desist from such unfair labor practice, and to take such affirmative action as will effectuate the purposes and policy of this chapter, such as the payment of damages and/or the reinstatement of employees.

(3) The commission may petition the superior court for the county in which the main office of the employer is located or wherein the person who has engaged or is engaging in such unfair labor practice resides or transacts business, for the enforcement of its order and for appropriate temporary relief.

[ 2018 c 252 s 2; 1983 c 58 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 16.]